test/src/dict-gt-yamls/V-Clex_tabahtud_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Verb - tábáhtuđ: # 
    tábáhtuđ+V+Inf: tábáhtuđ
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tábáhtuum
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: tábáhtuuh
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tábáhtuṿá
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: tábáhtuvveen
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: tábáhtuuvettee
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: tábáhtuvvâv
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: tábáhtup
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tábáhtuuvetteđ
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tábáhtuṿeh
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tábáhtuvvim
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: tábáhtuvvih
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tábáhtui
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: tábáhtuim
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: tábáhtuid
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: tábáhtuin
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: tábáhtuim
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: tábáhtuid
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tábáhtuvvii
    tábáhtuđ+V+Cond+Sg1: tábáhtuuččim
    tábáhtuđ+V+Cond+Sg2: tábáhtuuččih
    tábáhtuđ+V+Cond+Sg3: tábáhtuuččij
    tábáhtuđ+V+Cond+Du1: tábáhtuuččáim
    tábáhtuđ+V+Cond+Du2: tábáhtuuččáid
    tábáhtuđ+V+Cond+Du3: tábáhtuuččáin
    tábáhtuđ+V+Cond+Pl1: tábáhtuuččijm
    tábáhtuđ+V+Cond+Pl2: tábáhtuuččijd
    tábáhtuđ+V+Cond+Pl3: tábáhtuuččii
    tábáhtuđ+V+Pot+Sg1: tábáhtužžeem
    tábáhtuđ+V+Pot+Sg2: tábáhtužžeeh
    tábáhtuđ+V+Pot+Sg3: tábáhtuš            # tábáhtuž
    tábáhtuđ+V+Pot+Du1: tábáhtužžeen
    tábáhtuđ+V+Pot+Du2: tábáhtušvettee      # tábáhtužvettee
    tábáhtuđ+V+Pot+Du3: tábáhtužžuv
    tábáhtuđ+V+Pot+Pl1: tábáhtužžep
    tábáhtuđ+V+Pot+Pl2: tábáhtušvetteđ      # tábáhtužvetteđ
    tábáhtuđ+V+Pot+Pl3: tábáhtužeh
    tábáhtuđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: tábáhtuvvum       # ø
    tábáhtuđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: tábáhtuu          
    tábáhtuđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: tábáhtuvvus       # tábáhtus
    tábáhtuđ+V+Imprt+Du1: tábáhtuvvoon      # tábáhtoon
    tábáhtuđ+V+Imprt+Du2: tábáhtuvvee       # tábáhtoo
    tábáhtuđ+V+Imprt+Du3: tábáhtuvvus       # tábáhtus
    tábáhtuđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: tábáhtuvvop       # tábáhtup
    tábáhtuđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: tábáhtuđ          
    tábáhtuđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: tábáhtuvvus       # tábáhtus
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: tábáhtuu
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: tábáhtum
    tábáhtuđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: tábáhtuččii
    tábáhtuđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: tábáhtužžii
    tábáhtuđ+V+PrsPrc: tábáhtuvvee
    tábáhtuđ+V+PrfPrc: tábáhtum
    tábáhtuđ+V+Actio: tábáhtum
    tábáhtuđ+V+Actio+Ess: tábáhtuumin
    tábáhtuđ+V+Actio+Loc: tábáhtuumist
    tábáhtuđ+V+Actio+Ill: tábáhtuumân
    tábáhtuđ+V+Ger: tábáhtuudijn
    tábáhtuđ+V+VAbess: tábáhtuuhánnáá
    
    
      Verb - uáˊđistuđ: # 
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Inf: uáˊđistuđ
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uáˊđistuum
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: uáˊđistuuh
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uáˊđistuṿá
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: uáˊđistuvveen
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: uáˊđistuuvettee
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: uáˊđistuvvâv
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: uáˊđistup
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: uáˊđistuuvetteđ
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: uáˊđistuṿeh
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: uáˊđistuvvim
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: uáˊđistuvvih
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: uáˊđistui
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: uáˊđistuim
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: uáˊđistuid
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: uáˊđistuin
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: uáˊđistuim
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: uáˊđistuid
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: uáˊđistuvvii
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Cond+Sg1: uáˊđistuuččim
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Cond+Sg2: uáˊđistuuččih
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Cond+Sg3: uáˊđistuuččij
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Cond+Du1: uáˊđistuuččáim
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Cond+Du2: uáˊđistuuččáid
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Cond+Du3: uáˊđistuuččáin
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Cond+Pl1: uáˊđistuuččijm
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Cond+Pl2: uáˊđistuuččijd
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Cond+Pl3: uáˊđistuuččii
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Pot+Sg1: uáˊđistužžeem
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Pot+Sg2: uáˊđistužžeeh
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Pot+Sg3: uáˊđistuš          # uáˊđistuž
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Pot+Du1: uáˊđistužžeen
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Pot+Du2: uáˊđistušvettee    # uáˊđistužvettee
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Pot+Du3: uáˊđistužžuv
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Pot+Pl1: uáˊđistužžep
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Pot+Pl2: uáˊđistušvetteđ    # uáˊđistužvetteđ
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Pot+Pl3: uáˊđistužeh
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: uáˊđistuvvum     # ø
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: uáˊđistuu        
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: uáˊđistuvvus     # uáˊđistus
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Imprt+Du1: uáˊđistuvvoon    # uáˊđistoon
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Imprt+Du2: uáˊđistuvvee     # uáˊđistoo
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Imprt+Du3: uáˊđistuvvus     # uáˊđistus
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: uáˊđistuvvop     # uáˊđistup
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: uáˊđistuđ        
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: uáˊđistuvvus     # uáˊđistus
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: uáˊđistuu 
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: uáˊđistum
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: uáˊđistuččii
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: uáˊđistužžii
    uáˊđistuđ+V+PrsPrc: uáˊđistuvvee
    uáˊđistuđ+V+PrfPrc: uáˊđistum
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Actio: uáˊđistum
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Actio+Ess: uáˊđistuumin
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Actio+Loc: uáˊđistuumist
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Actio+Ill: uáˊđistuumân
    uáˊđistuđ+V+Ger: uáˊđistuudijn
    uáˊđistuđ+V+VAbess: uáˊđistuuhánnáá
    
    
      Verb - pillâšuđ: # 
    pillâšuđ+V+Inf: pillâšuđ
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pillâšuum
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: pillâšuuh
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pillâšuṿá
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: pillâšuvveen
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: pillâšuuvettee
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: pillâšuvvâv
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: pillâšup
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: pillâšuuvetteđ
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pillâšuṿeh
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: pillâšuvvim
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: pillâšuvvih
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: pillâšui
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: pillâšuim
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: pillâšuid
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: pillâšuin
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: pillâšuim
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: pillâšuid
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: pillâšuvvii
    pillâšuđ+V+Cond+Sg1: pillâšuuččim
    pillâšuđ+V+Cond+Sg2: pillâšuuččih
    pillâšuđ+V+Cond+Sg3: pillâšuuččij
    pillâšuđ+V+Cond+Du1: pillâšuuččáim
    pillâšuđ+V+Cond+Du2: pillâšuuččáid
    pillâšuđ+V+Cond+Du3: pillâšuuččáin
    pillâšuđ+V+Cond+Pl1: pillâšuuččijm
    pillâšuđ+V+Cond+Pl2: pillâšuuččijd
    pillâšuđ+V+Cond+Pl3: pillâšuuččii
    pillâšuđ+V+Pot+Sg1: pillâšužžeem
    pillâšuđ+V+Pot+Sg2: pillâšužžeeh
    pillâšuđ+V+Pot+Sg3: pillâšuš            # pillâšuž
    pillâšuđ+V+Pot+Du1: pillâšužžeen
    pillâšuđ+V+Pot+Du2: pillâšušvettee      # pillâšužvettee
    pillâšuđ+V+Pot+Du3: pillâšužžuv
    pillâšuđ+V+Pot+Pl1: pillâšužžep
    pillâšuđ+V+Pot+Pl2: pillâšušvetteđ      # pillâšužvetteđ
    pillâšuđ+V+Pot+Pl3: pillâšužeh
    pillâšuđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: pillâšuvvum       # ø
    pillâšuđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: pillâšuu          
    pillâšuđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: pillâšuvvus       # pillâšus
    pillâšuđ+V+Imprt+Du1: pillâšuvvoon      # pillâšoon
    pillâšuđ+V+Imprt+Du2: pillâšuvvee       # pillâšoo
    pillâšuđ+V+Imprt+Du3: pillâšuvvus       # pillâšus
    pillâšuđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: pillâšuvvop       # pillâšup
    pillâšuđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: pillâšuđ          
    pillâšuđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: pillâšuvvus       # pillâšus
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: pillâšuu 
    pillâšuđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: pillâšum
    pillâšuđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: pillâšuččii
    pillâšuđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: pillâšužžii
    pillâšuđ+V+PrsPrc: pillâšuvvee
    pillâšuđ+V+PrfPrc: pillâšum
    pillâšuđ+V+Actio: pillâšum
    pillâšuđ+V+Actio+Ess: pillâšuumin
    pillâšuđ+V+Actio+Loc: pillâšuumist
    pillâšuđ+V+Actio+Ill: pillâšuumân
    pillâšuđ+V+Ger: pillâšuudijn
    pillâšuđ+V+VAbess: pillâšuuhánnáá
    
    
      Verb - rähistuđ: # 
    rähistuđ+V+Inf: rähistuđ
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rähistuum
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: rähistuuh
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: rähistuṿá
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: rähistuvveen
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: rähistuuvettee
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: rähistuvvâv
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: rähistup
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: rähistuuvetteđ
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: rähistuṿeh
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: rähistuvvim
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: rähistuvvih
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: rähistui
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: rähistuim
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: rähistuid
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: rähistuin
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: rähistuim
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: rähistuid
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: rähistuvvii
    rähistuđ+V+Cond+Sg1: rähistuuččim
    rähistuđ+V+Cond+Sg2: rähistuuččih
    rähistuđ+V+Cond+Sg3: rähistuuččij
    rähistuđ+V+Cond+Du1: rähistuuččáim
    rähistuđ+V+Cond+Du2: rähistuuččáid
    rähistuđ+V+Cond+Du3: rähistuuččáin
    rähistuđ+V+Cond+Pl1: rähistuuččijm
    rähistuđ+V+Cond+Pl2: rähistuuččijd
    rähistuđ+V+Cond+Pl3: rähistuuččii
    rähistuđ+V+Pot+Sg1: rähistužžeem
    rähistuđ+V+Pot+Sg2: rähistužžeeh
    rähistuđ+V+Pot+Sg3: rähistuš            # rähistuž
    rähistuđ+V+Pot+Du1: rähistužžeen
    rähistuđ+V+Pot+Du2: rähistušvettee      # rähistužvettee
    rähistuđ+V+Pot+Du3: rähistužžuv
    rähistuđ+V+Pot+Pl1: rähistužžep
    rähistuđ+V+Pot+Pl2: rähistušvetteđ      # rähistužvetteđ
    rähistuđ+V+Pot+Pl3: rähistužeh
    rähistuđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: rähistuvvum       # ø
    rähistuđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: rähistuu          
    rähistuđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: rähistuvvus       # rähistus
    rähistuđ+V+Imprt+Du1: rähistuvvoon      # rähistoon
    rähistuđ+V+Imprt+Du2: rähistuvvee       # rähistoo
    rähistuđ+V+Imprt+Du3: rähistuvvus       # rähistus
    rähistuđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: rähistuvvop       # rähistup
    rähistuđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: rähistuđ          
    rähistuđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: rähistuvvus       # rähistus
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: rähistuu 
    rähistuđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: rähistum
    rähistuđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: rähistuččii
    rähistuđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: rähistužžii
    rähistuđ+V+PrsPrc: rähistuvvee
    rähistuđ+V+PrfPrc: rähistum
    rähistuđ+V+Actio: rähistum
    rähistuđ+V+Actio+Ess: rähistuumin
    rähistuđ+V+Actio+Loc: rähistuumist
    rähistuđ+V+Actio+Ill: rähistuumân
    rähistuđ+V+Ger: rähistuudijn
    rähistuđ+V+VAbess: rähistuuhánnáá
    
    
